test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-ááhkioohsatsis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ááhkioohsa'tsisi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, boat AEW NA1
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Sg: ááhkioohsa'tsisi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Pl: ááhkioohsa'tsiistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Non: ááhkioohsa'tsisi

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nitááhkioohsa'tsimi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nitááhkioohsa'tsimistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nitááhkioohsa'tsimi

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nitááhkioohsa'tsiminnaani
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nitááhkioohsa'tsiminnaanistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nitááhkioohsa'tsiminnaani

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: kitááhkioohsa'tsiminnooni
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: kitááhkioohsa'tsiminnoonistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Non: kitááhkioohsa'tsiminnooni

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kitááhkioohsa'tsimi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kitááhkioohsa'tsimistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kitááhkioohsa'tsimi

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: kitááhkioohsa'tsimoaawayi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: kitááhkioohsa'tsimoaawaistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Non: kitááhkioohsa'tsimoaawai

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: otááhkioohsa'tsimi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: otááhkioohsa'tsimistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Non: otááhkioohsa'tsimi

     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: otááhkioohsa'tsimoaawayi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: otááhkioohsa'tsimoaawaistsi
     ááhkioohsa'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Non: otááhkioohsa'tsimoaawai
